Hawaii statutes.
§232E-3 Duties. The commission
shall conduct a systematic review of the State's tax structure, using such
standards as equity and efficiency. Thirty days prior to the convening of the
second regular session of the legislature after the members of the commission
have been appointed, the commission shall submit to the legislature an
evaluation of the State's tax structure and recommend revenue and tax policy,
except that:

(1) For the commission appointed on or before July 1,
1980, or the replacement commission intended to function prior to the
appointment of a new commission on or before July 1, 1985, the commission shall
submit the required evaluation and recommendations to the legislature thirty
days prior to the convening of the regular session of 1985;

(2) For the commission appointed on or before July 1,
2010, or the successor commission intended to function prior to the appointment
of a new commission on or before July 1, 2015, the commission shall submit the
required evaluation and recommendations to the legislature thirty days prior to
the convening of the regular session of 2013; and

(3) For the commission appointed on or before July 1,
2015, or the successor commission intended to function prior to the appointment
of a new commission on or before July 1, 2020, the commission shall submit the
required evaluation and recommendations to the legislature thirty days prior to
the convening of the regular session of 2018. [L 1979, c 218, pt of §2; am L
1983, c 212, §2; am L 2012, c 181, §1; am L 2016, c 222, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next